Washington statutes.
RCW 19.31.040

Contract between agency and applicant—Contents—Notice.

An employment agency shall provide each applicant with a copy of the contract between the applicant and employment agency which shall have printed on it or attached to it a copy of RCW 19.31.170 as now or hereafter amended. Such contract shall contain the following:

(1) The name, address, and telephone number of the employment agency;

(2) Trade name if any;

(3) The date of the contract;

(4) The name of the applicant;

(5) The amount of the fee to be charged the applicant, or the method of computation of the fee, and the time and method of payments: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That if the provisions of the contract come within the definition of a "retail installment transaction", as defined in RCW 63.14.010, the contract shall conform to the requirements of chapter 63.14 RCW, as now or hereafter amended;

(6) A notice in eight-point boldface type or larger directly above the space reserved in the contract for the signature of the buyer. The caption, "NOTICE TO APPLICANT—READ BEFORE SIGNING" shall precede the body of the notice and shall be in ten-point boldface type or larger. The notice shall read as follows:

"This is a contract. If you accept employment with any employer through [name of employment agency] you will be liable for the payment of the fee as set out above. Do not sign this contract before you read it or if any spaces intended for the agreed terms are left blank. You must be given a copy of this contract at the time you sign it."

The notice for an employment listing service shall read as follows:

"This is a contract. You understand [the employment listing service] provides information on bona fide job listings but does not guarantee you will be offered a job. You also understand you are liable for the payment of the fee when you receive the list or referral. Do not sign this contract before you read it or if any spaces intended for the agreed terms are left blank. You must be given a copy of this contract at the time you sign it."

The notice for an employment directory shall read as follows if the directory is sold in person:

"This is a contract. You understand [the employment directory] provides information on possible employers along with general employment, industry, and geographical information to assist you, but does not list actual job openings or guarantee you will obtain employment through its services. You also understand you are liable for the payment of the fee when you receive the directory. Do not sign this contract before you read it or if any spaces intended for the agreed terms are left blank. You must be given a copy of this contract at the time you sign it."

A verbal notice for an employment directory shall be as follows before accepting a fee if the directory is sold over the telephone:

"You understand [the employment directory] provides information on possible employers along with general employment, industry, and geographical information to assist you, but does not list actual job openings or guarantee you will obtain employment through its services. You also understand you are liable for the payment of the fee when you order the directory."

A copy of the contract must be sent to all applicants ordering by telephone and must specify the following information:

(a) Name, address, and phone number of employment directory;

(b) Name, address, and phone number of applicant;

(c) Date of order;

(d) Date verbal notice was read to applicant along with a printed statement to read as follows:

"On [date verbal notice was read] and prior to placing this order the following statement was read to you: "You understand [the employment directory] provides information on possible employers along with general employment, industry, and geographical information to assist you, but does not list actual job openings or guarantee you will be offered a job. You also understand you are liable for the payment of the fee when you order the directory."; and

(e) Signature of employment directory representative.

[ 1993 c 499 s 3; 1985 c 7 s 83; 1977 ex.s. c 51 s 2; 1969 ex.s. c 228 s 4.]